District of Columbia statutes.
7-2509.11

Rules.

The Chief of the MPD, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of D.C. Law 20-279, including rules:

(1)

To establish criteria for determining when an applicant has, pursuant to section 6 of the Pistols and Other Dangerous Weapons Act [§ 22-4506]:

(A)

Demonstrated a good reason to fear injury to his or her person, which shall at a minimum require a showing of a special need for self-protection distinguishable from the general community as supported by evidence of specific threats or previous attacks that demonstrate a special danger to the applicant’s life;

(B)

Demonstrated any other proper reason for carrying a concealed pistol, which shall at a minimum include types of employment that require the handling of cash or other valuable objects that may be transported upon the applicant’s person; and

(C)

Demonstrated the applicant’s suitability to carry a concealed pistol, which shall at a minimum include evidence that the applicant meets the requirements of § 7-2509.02;

(2)

To establish the type and amount of ammunition that may be carried concealed by a licensee;

(3)

To establish the methods by which a pistol may be carried, including any standards for safe holstering;

(4)

To establish all application forms, investigation procedures, background checks, and fees necessary to process an application for a license to carry a concealed pistol;

(5)

To specify any procedures or requirements specific to non-residents who apply to carry a concealed pistol pursuant to § 22-4506, with regard to the registration requirements in this unit;

(6)

To specify requirements for signage on any private premises where the owner or person in control of the premises prohibits the carrying of a concealed pistol pursuant to § 7-2509.07(b); and

(7)

To establish procedures for the renewal of licenses.

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, § 911
as added June 16, 2015, D.C. Law 20-279, § 2(f), 62 DCR 1944
D.C. Law 20-279, referred to in the introductory language of this section, enacted § 7-2502.11a and this subchapter, amended §§ 7-2502.01(b)(4), 7-2502.02(a)(4), 7-2502.03(a)(4), 22-4504(a), and 22-4506, and repealed §  22-2511.